dictsource/ciw_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Chippewa


.group a
   a       V
   aa      a:

.group b
   b       b
   b (_    p

.group ch
   ch      tS#

.group d
   d       d
   d (_    t

.group e
   e       e:

.group f
   f       f

.group g
   g       g
   g (_    k

.group h
   h       h

.group '
   '       ?

.group i
   i       I
   ii      i:

.group j
   j       dZ
   j (_    tS

.group k
   k       k#
   k (_    k

.group l
   l       l

.group m
   m       m
   mb      mb
   mb (_   mp

.group n
   n       n
   nd      nd
   nd (_   nt
   ng      Ng
   ng (_   Nk
   nh      ~
   ns      ~s
   ny      ~y
   nz      nz
   nz (_   ns
   nzh     nZ
   nzh (_  nS

.group o
   o       o
   oo      o:

.group p
   p       ph
   p (_    p

.group r
   r       r

.group s
   s       sh
   s (_    s
   sh      Sh
   sh (_   S
   sk      sk
   sp      sp
   st      st
   shk     Sk
   shp     Sp
   sht     St

.group t
   t       t#
   t (_    t

.group w
   w       w

.group y
   y       j

.group z
   z       z
   z (_    s
   zh      Z
   zh (_   S
